Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.070

Purchase of property from federal government authorized—Authority to contract—Bidding—Payment.

The state of Washington, through any department, division, bureau, board, commission, authority, or agency thereof, and all counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions thereof, is hereby authorized to enter into any contract with the United States of America, or with any agency thereof, for the purchase of any equipment, supplies, materials, or other property, without regard to the provisions of any law requiring the advertising, giving of notices, inviting or receiving bids, or which may require the delivery of purchases before payment, and to this end the executive head of any such department, division, bureau, board, commission, authority, or agency of the state, the county commissioners and the executive authority of any city or town, may designate by appropriate resolution or order any officeholder or employee of its own to enter a bid or bids in its behalf at any sale of any equipment, supplies, material or other property real or personal owned by the United States of America or any agency thereof, and may authorize said person to make any down payment, or payment in full, required in connection with such bidding.

[ 1945 c 180 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-50. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1945 c 88 s 1 now codified as RCW 39.32.090.]